Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5050.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-130. Special plate for the Blackstone Valley Tourism Council, Inc.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available
special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit entity Blackstone Valley Tourism
Council, Inc. The plates shall be designed to reference the not-for-profit entity Blackstone Valley
Tourism Council, Inc. and the Blackstone River Valley Environmental Clean-up and Education
Fund.
(b) The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the
vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the
registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be
removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate
for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with § 31-3-9. The registration certificate
shall be in effect for the special plate.
(c) The Blackstone Valley Tourism Council, Inc. motor vehicle plates shall be the same
size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Blackstone Valley Tourism
Council, Inc. in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the design approved by the
Rhode Island state police.
(d) The Blackstone Valley Tourism Council, Inc. plates shall be subject to compliance with

§ 31-3-117 relating to the number of minimum prepaid orders of plates per plate type (i.e.,
passenger, commercial, etc.) and any required payment. The Blackstone Valley Tourism Council,
Inc. plates shall not be issued unless the minimum order requirements are met. The initial order
will be handled by the Blackstone Valley Tourism Council, Inc. and shall not be submitted to the
division of motor vehicles for production until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper
paper work submitted to the division.
(e) The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other
procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
(f) In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, Blackstone Valley
Tourism Council, Inc. plates shall be subject to a forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.
(g) The forty dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty
dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00)
shall be distributed annually to the Blackstone Valley Tourism Council, Inc. to provide funding for
the Blackstone River Valley Environmental Clean-up and Education Fund.
(h) A ten dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated
to the Blackstone Valley Tourism Council, Inc.
(i) In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Blackstone Valley
Tourism Council, Inc. plates, the Blackstone Valley Tourism Council, Inc. must use any Rhode
Island-sourced funds in and for the benefit of Rhode Island-based charitable organizations.
(j) Blackstone Valley Tourism Council, Inc. will be required to submit an annual
accounting report before such monies are distributed.
(k) There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of Blackstone Valley Tourism Council,
Inc. plates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect six (6) months after passage.
========
LC000156/SUB A
========
LC000156/SUB A - Page 2 of 3